Washington statutes.
RCW 7.60.070

Turnover of property.

Upon demand by a receiver appointed under this chapter, any person shall turn over any property over which the receiver has been appointed that is within the possession or control of that person unless otherwise ordered by the court for good cause shown. A receiver by motion may seek to compel turnover of estate property unless there exists a bona fide dispute with respect to the existence or nature of the receiver's interest in the property, in which case turnover shall be sought by means of an action under RCW 7.60.160. In the absence of a bona fide dispute with respect to the receiver's right to possession of estate property, the failure to relinquish possession and control to the receiver shall be punishable as a contempt of the court.

[ 2004 c 165 s 9.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—2004 c 165: See notes following RCW 7.60.005.